Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IV.] COVERAGES

[§431:10E-151] Notice requirement.
Thirteen months prior to discontinuation of writing property insurance
coverage, an insurer shall file an affidavit with the commissioner stating the
reasons for the discontinuation. [L 2016, c 141, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next